Mississippi, session 2026, HB980.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 43-19-101, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-19-101.  (1)  The following child-support award guidelines shall be a rebuttable presumption in all judicial or administrative proceedings regarding the awarding or modifying of child-support awards in this state: * * *Number Of Children  Percentage Of Adjusted Gross Income Due Support   That Should Be Awarded For Support 1       14% 2       20% 3       22% 4       24% 5 or more      26% Combined Adjusted  One Two      Three     Four       Five      Six Monthly  Child Children  Children  Children  Children  Children Gross Income   Total      Total Total     Total     Total     Total 0-950     100       100       100       100       100       100 1000      119       120       122       123       124       126 1050      156       158       160       161       163       165 1100      190       193       195       197       199       201 1150      224       230       233       235       238       240 1200      233       265       268       270       273       276 1250      242       299       303       306       309       312 1300      251       337       340       344       348       352 1350      260       402       375       380       384       388 1400      269       417       413       418       422       427 1450      277       430       448       453       458       463 1500      286       443       483       489       494       499 1550      295       458       561       527       533       538 1600      304       471       578       562       568       574 1650      313       484       594       598       604       611 1700      322       499       612       682       643       650 1750      330       512       628       700       679       686 1800      340       526       646       720       717       725 1850      348       539       661       737       753       761 1900      356       552       677       754       830       796 1950      365       565       693       773       850       834 2000      373       578       709       790       869       869 2050      382       590       724       807       888       904 2100      390       604       740       826       908       988 2150      399       617       756       843       927       1008 2200      407       630       772       861       947       1030 2250      416       643       787       878       966       1051 2300      424       655       803       895       985       1071 2350      433       669       819       914       1005      1093 2400      441       681       835       931       1024      1114 2450      449       694       850       948       1043      1135 2500      458       709       868       968       1064      1158 2550      467       722       884       985       1084      1179 2600      476       736       901       1005      1105      1203 2650      485       749       917       1023      1125      1224 2700      493       762       933       1040      1145      1245 2750      502       776       951       1060      1166      1268 2800      511       790       967       1078      1185      1290 2850      519       803       983       1096      1205      1311 2900      529       817       1000      1115      1226      1334 2950      537       830       1016      1133      1246      1356 3000      546       844       1033      1152      1267      1379 3050      555       857       1048      1169      1286      1399 3100      563       869       1063      1186      1304      1419 3150      572       883       1080      1204      1324      1441 3200      580       895       1095      1221      1343      1461 3250      588       908       1110      1237      1361      1481 3300      597       921       1126      1256      1381      1503 3350      605       934       1141      1272      1400      1523 3400      614       947       1157      1291      1420      1545 3450      622       960       1173      1307      1438      1565 3500      631       973       1188      1324      1457      1585 3550      640       986       1204      1342      1477      1607 3600      648       999       1219      1360      1496      1627 3650      656       1012      1235      1377      1515      1649 3700      666       1026      1253      1397      1537      1672 3750      674       1039      1269      1415      1556      1693 3800      683       1054      1286      1434      1578      1716 3850      692       1067      1302      1452      1597      1738 3900      700       1080      1318      1470      1617      1759 3950      710       1094      1336      1489      1638      1782 4000      718       1107      1352      1507      1658      1804 4050      727       1120      1368      1525      1678      1825 4100      736       1135      1385      1544      1699      1848 4150      745       1148      1401      1562      1719      1870 4200      753       1161      1417      1580      1738      1891 4250      761       1172      1430      1595      1754      1908 4300      768       1183      1443      1609      1770      1926 4350      776       1194      1457      1624      1787      1944 4400      782       1204      1468      1637      1800      1959 4450      789       1213      1479      1649      1814      1974 4500      796       1224      1492      1664      1830      1991 4550      802       1234      1504      1677      1844      2007 4600      810       1245      1517      1691      1860      2024 4650      816       1255      1528      1704      1874      2039 4700      823       1264      1539      1717      1888      2054 4750      830       1275      1552      1731      1904      2072 4800      836       1285      1564      1744      1918      2087 4850      842       1293      1574      1755      1931      2101 4900      847       1301      1583      1765      1941      2112 4950      851       1307      1591      1773      1951      2122 5000      856       1315      1599      1783      1961      2134 5050      861       1321      1607      1792      1971      2144 5100      865       1327      1614      1800      1980      2154 5150      870       1335      1623      1810      1991      2166 5200      874       1341      1631      1818      2000      2176 5250      878       1348      1638      1827      2009      2186 5300      883       1355      1647      1837      2020      2198 5350      887       1361      1655      1845      2030      2208 5400      892       1369      1663      1855      2040      2220 5450      897       1375      1671      1863      2050      2230 5500      901       1381      1679      1872      2059      2240 5550      905       1387      1685      1879      2067      2249 5600      907       1390      1689      1883      2071      2254 5650      909       1394      1693      1887      2076      2259 5700      912       1398      1697      1892      2082      2265 5750      914       1401      1701      1897      2086      2270 5800      917       1405      1705      1901      2092      2276 5850      919       1408      1709      1906      2096      2281 5900      922       1411      1713      1910      2101      2286 5950      924       1415      1717      1915      2106      2292 6000      927       1419      1721      1919      2111      2297 6050      929       1422      1725      1923      2116      2302 6100      931       1426      1729      1928      2121      2308 6150      934       1429      1733      1933      2126      2313 6200      936       1433      1738      1938      2131      2319 6250      941       1440      1745      1946      2141      2329 6300      946       1447      1754      1956      2151      2341 6350      952       1456      1764      1967      2164      2354 6400      957       1463      1773      1977      2174      2366 6450      962       1471      1782      1987      2185      2377 6500      968       1479      1792      1998      2197      2391 6550      973       1487      1800      2007      2208      2403 6600      978       1495      1810      2019      2220      2416 6650      983       1503      1819      2028      2231      2428 6700      989       1510      1828      2038      2242      2439 6750      994       1519      1838      2049      2254      2453 6800      999       1526      1847      2059      2265      2464 6850      1004      1534      1855      2069      2276      2476 6900      1010      1542      1865      2080      2288      2489 6950      1015      1551      1876      2091      2300      2503 7000      1022      1560      1887      2104      2315      2518 7050      1027      1568      1897      2116      2327      2532 7100      1032      1577      1908      2127      2340      2546 7150      1039      1586      1919      2140      2354      2561 7200      1044      1595      1930      2151      2367      2575 7250      1049      1603      1940      2163      2379      2588 7300      1055      1612      1951      2176      2393      2604 7350      1061      1621      1962      2187      2406      2618 7400      1067      1630      1973      2200      2420      2633 7450      1072      1638      1984      2212      2433      2647 7500      1078      1647      1994      2223      2445      2660 7550      1084      1656      2005      2236      2460      2676 7600      1088      1663      2014      2246      2470      2688 7650      1089      1664      2015      2247      2471      2689 7700      1090      1665      2016      2248      2472      2690 7750      1090      1666      2016      2248      2473      2691 7800      1091      1667      2017      2249      2474      2692 7850      1092      1668      2018      2250      2475      2693 7900      1092      1668      2019      2251      2476      2694 7950      1093      1669      2020      2252      2477      2695 8000      1094      1670      2020      2253      2478      2696 8050      1094      1671      2021      2253      2479      2697 8100      1095      1672      2022      2254      2480      2698 8150      1096      1672      2023      2255      2481      2699 8200      1097      1673      2023      2256      2482      2700 8250      1097      1674      2024      2257      2483      2701 8300      1098      1676      2026      2259      2485      2704 8350      1103      1683      2035      2269      2495      2715 8400      1108      1690      2042      2277      2505      2725 8450      1113      1697      2051      2286      2515      2736 8500      1118      1704      2059      2295      2525      2747 8550      1122      1711      2067      2304      2535      2758 8600      1127      1718      2075      2313      2545      2768 8650      1132      1725      2083      2322      2554      2779 8700      1136      1732      2091      2331      2564      2790 8750      1141      1738      2099      2340      2574      2800 8800      1146      1745      2107      2349      2584      2811 8850      1150      1752      2115      2358      2594      2822 8900      1155      1759      2123      2367      2603      2832 8950      1160      1766      2131      2376      2613      2843 9000      1164      1773      2138      2384      2622      2853 9050      1167      1777      2143      2389      2628      2860 9100      1169      1780      2148      2395      2634      2866 9150      1172      1784      2152      2400      2640      2872 9200      1175      1788      2157      2405      2646      2879 9250      1177      1792      2162      2410      2651      2885 9300      1180      1796      2167      2416      2657      2891 9350      1182      1800      2171      2421      2663      2897 9400      1185      1804      2176      2426      2669      2904 9450      1187      1808      2181      2432      2675      2910 9500      1190      1812      2185      2437      2680      2916 9550      1193      1816      2190      2442      2686      2923 9600      1195      1820      2195      2447      2692      2929 9650      1198      1823      2200      2453      2698      2935 9700      1200      1827      2204      2458      2704      2942 9750      1204      1832      2210      2464      2711      2949 9800      1207      1837      2216      2471      2718      2957 9850      1210      1842      2222      2478      2725      2965 9900      1213      1847      2228      2484      2733      2973 9950      1216      1852      2234      2491      2740      2981 10000     1220      1857      2240      2497      2747      2989 10050     1223      1862      2246      2504      2754      2997 10100     1226      1866      2252      2510      2762      3005 10150     1229      1871      2257      2517      2769      3012 10200     1233      1876      2263      2524      2776      3020 10250     1236      1881      2269      2530      2783      3028 10300     1239      1886      2275      2537      2790      3036 10350     1242      1891      2281      2543      2798      3044 10400     1245      1896      2287      2550      2805      3052 10450     1249      1901      2293      2556      2812      3060 10500     1252      1905      2299      2563      2819      3067 10550     1255      1910      2305      2570      2827       3075 10600     1258      1915      2311      2576      2834      3083 10650     1261      1920      2316      2583      2841      3091 10700     1265      1925      2322      2589      2848      3099 10750     1268      1930      2328      2596      2856      3107 10800     1272      1935      2335      2604      2864      3116 10850     1275      1941      2342      2612      2873      3126 10900     1279      1947      2349      2620      2881      3135 10950     1283      1953      2356      2627      2890      3145 11000     1286      1959      2364      2635      2899      3154 11050     1290      1964      2371      2643      2908      3164 11100     1294      1970      2378      2652      2917      3174 11150     1298      1977      2386      2660      2926      3184 11200     1302      1983      2394      2669      2936      3194 11250     1306      1990      2402      2678      2946      3205 11300     1310      1996      2409      2687      2955      3215 11350     1314      2002      2417      2695      2965      3226 11400     1319      2009      2425      2704      2974      3236 11450     1323      2015      2433      2713      2984      3247 11500     1327      2021      2441      2721      2994      3257 11550     1331      2028      2449      2730      3003      3267 11600     1335      2034      2456      2739      3013      3278 11650     1339      2040      2464      2748      3022      3288 11700     1343      2047      2472      2756      3032      3299 11750     1347      2053      2480      2765      3042      3309 11800     1351      2059      2488      2774      3051      3320 11850     1355      2066      2495      2782      3061      3330 11900     1359      2072      2503      2791      3070      3341 11950     1363      2079      2511      2800      3080      3351 12000     1367      2085      2519      2809      3090      3361 12050     1372      2091      2527      2817      3099      3372 12100     1375      2097      2533      2825      3107      3380 12150     1379      2102      2539      2831      3114      3388 12200     1383      2107      2544      2836      3120      3395 12250     1387      2112      2549      2842      3127      3402 12300     1390      2117      2555      2848      3133      3409 12350     1394      2122      2560      2854      3140      3416 12400     1398      2127      2565      2860      3146      3423 12450     1401      2132      2571      2866      3153      3430 12500     1405      2137      2576      2872      3159      3437 12550     1409      2142      2581      2878      3166      3445 12600     1413      2147      2587      2884      3173      3452 12650     1416      2152      2592      2890      3179      3459 12700     1420      2157      2597      2896      3186      3466 12750     1424      2162      2603      2902      3192      3473 12800     1427      2167      2608      2908      3199      3480 12850     1431      2172      2613      2914      3205      3487 12900     1435      2178      2619      2920      3212      3495 12950     1438      2183      2624      2926      3218      3502 13000     1442      2188      2629      2932      3225      3509 13050     1446      2193      2635      2938      3232      3516 13100     1450      2198      2640      2944      3238      3523 13150     1453      2203      2645      2950      3245      3530 13200     1457      2208      2651      2956      3251      3537 13250     1461      2213      2656      2962      3258      3544 13300     1464      2218      2661      2968      3264      3552 13350     1468      2223      2667      2973      3271      3559 13400     1470      2226      2671      2978      3275      3564 13450     1472      2229      2674      2981      3280      3568 13500     1473      2231      2677      2985      3284      3573 13550     1475      2234      2681      2989      3288      3577 13600     1477      2236      2684      2993      3292      3582 13650     1478      2239      2687      2996      3296      3586 13700     1480      2242      2691      3000      3300      3591 13750     1482      2244      2694      3004      3304      3595 13800     1483      2247      2697      3008      3308      3600 13850     1485      2250      2701      3011      3313      3604 13900     1486      2252      2704      3015      3317      3609 13950     1488      2255      2708      3019      3321      3613 14000     1490      2257      2711      3023      3325      3618 14050     1491      2260      2714      3026      3329      3622 14100     1493      2263      2718      3030      3333      3627 14150     1495      2265      2721      3034      3337      3631 14200     1496      2268      2724      3038      3341      3636 14250     1498      2271      2728      3041      3346      3640 14300     1500      2273      2731      3045      3350      3645 14350     1501      2276      2734      3049      3354      3649 14400     1503      2279      2738      3053      3358      3653 14450     1504      2281      2741      3056      3362      3658 14500     1506      2283      2744      3059      3365      3662 14550     1507      2286      2747      3063      3369      3666 14600     1509      2288      2750      3066      3373      3670 14650     1510      2290      2753      3069      3376      3673 14700     1513      2294      2758      3075      3383      3680 14750     1517      2301      2765      3084      3392      3690 14800     1521      2307      2773      3092      3401      3700 14850     1525      2313      2780      3100      3410      3710 14900     1530      2319      2788      3109      3419      3720 14950     1534      2326      2795      3117      3429      3730 15000     1538      2332      2803      3125      3438      3740 15050     1542      2338      2810      3133      3447      3750 15100     1546      2345      2818      3142      3456      3760 15150     1550      2351      2825      3150      3465      3770 15200     1554      2357      2833      3158      3474      3780 15250     1559      2363      2840      3167      3483      3790 15300     1563      2370      2848      3175      3493      3800 15350     1567      2376      2855      3183      3502      3810 15400     1571      2382      2863      3192      3511      3820 15450     1575      2388      2870      3200      3520      3830 15500     1579      2395      2878      3208      3529      3840 15550     1584      2401      2885      3217      3538      3850 15600     1588      2407      2892      3225      3548      3860 15650     1592      2413      2900      3233      3557      3870 15700     1596      2420      2907      3242      3566      3880 15750     1600      2426      2915      3250      3575      3890 15800     1604      2432      2922      3258      3584      3900 15850     1609      2438      2930      3267      3593      3910 15900     1613      2445      2937      3275      3603      3920 15950     1617      2451      2945      3283      3612      3930 16000     1621      2457      2952      3292      3621      3940 16050     1625      2463      2960      3300      3630      3949 16100     1629      2470      2967      3308      3639      3959 16150     1634      2476      2975      3317      3648      3969 16200     1638      2482      2982      3325      3658      3979 16250     1642      2488      2990      3333      3667      3989 16300     1646      2495      2997      3342      3676      3999 16350     1650      2501      3004      3350      3685      4009 16400     1654      2507      3012      3358      3694      4019 16450     1659      2514      3019      3367      3703      4029 16500     1662      2519      3026      3374      3712      4038 16550     1664      2522      3029      3378      3715      4042 16600     1666      2524      3032      3381      3719      4047 16650     1668      2527      3035      3385      3723      4051 16700     1669      2529      3038      3388      3726      4054 16750     1671      2532      3041      3390      3729      4058 16800     1672      2534      3043      3393      3733      4061 16850     1674      2536      3046      3396      3736      4064 16900     1675      2538      3048      3399      3739      4068 16950     1677      2540      3051      3402      3742      4071 17000     1678      2542      3053      3405      3745      4075 17050     1680      2545      3056      3407      3748      4078 17100     1681      2547      3059      3410      3751      4081 17150     1683      2549      3061      3413      3754      4085 17200     1684      2551      3064      3416      3758      4088 17250     1686      2553      3066      3419      3761      4092 17300     1687      2556      3069      3422      3764      4095 17350     1688      2558      3071      3424      3767      4098 17400     1690      2560      3074      3427      3770      4102 17450     1691      2562      3076      3430      3773      4105 17500     1693      2564      3079      3433      3776      4109 17550     1694      2566      3081      3436      3779      4112 17600     1696      2569      3084      3439      3782      4115 17650     1697      2571      3086      3441      3786      4119 17700     1699      2573      3089      3444      3789      4122 17750     1700      2575      3092      3447      3792      4125 17800     1702      2577      3094      3450      3795      4129 17850     1703      2579      3097      3453      3798      4132 17900     1705      2582      3099      3456      3801      4136 17950     1706      2584      3102      3458      3804      4139 18000     1708      2586      3104      3461      3807      4142 18050     1709      2588      3107      3464      3810      4146 18100     1710      2590      3109      3467      3813      4149 18150     1712      2592      3112      3469      3816      4152 18200     1713      2594      3114      3472      3819      4155 18250     1715      2596      3116      3475      3822      4158 18300     1716      2598      3119      3477      3825      4162 18350     1717      2600      3121      3480      3828      4165 18400     1719      2602      3123      3483      3831      4168 18450     1720      2604      3126      3485      3834      4171 18500     1722      2607      3128      3488      3837      4174 18550     1723      2609      3131      3491      3840      4178 18600     1724      2611      3133      3493      3843      4181 18650     1726      2613      3135      3496      3846      4184 18700     1727      2615      3138      3499      3849      4187 18750     1728      2617      3140      3501      3851      4190 18800     1730      2619      3143      3504      3854      4194 18850     1731      2621      3145      3507      3857      4197 18900     1733      2623      3147      3509      3860      4200 18950     1734      2625      3150      3512      3863      4203 19000     1735      2627      3152      3515      3866      4206 19050     1737      2629      3155      3517      3869      4210 19100     1738      2631      3157      3520      3872      4213 19150     1740      2633      3159      3523      3875      4216 19200     1741      2635      3162      3525      3878      4219 19250     1742      2637      3164      3528      3881      4222 19300     1744      2639      3167      3531      3884      4225 19350     1745      2641      3169      3533      3887      4229 19400     1746      2643      3171      3536      3890      4232 19450     1748      2645      3174      3539      3893      4235 19500     1749      2647      3176      3541      3895      4238 19550     1751      2649      3178      3544      3898      4241 19600     1752      2652      3181      3547      3901      4245 19650     1753      2654      3183      3549      3904      4248 19700     1755      2656      3186      3552      3907      4251 19750     1756      2658      3188      3555      3910      4254 19800     1758      2660      3190      3557      3913      4257 19850     1759      2662      3193      3560      3916      4261 19900     1760      2664      3195      3563      3919      4264 19950     1762      2666      3198      3565      3922      4267 20000     1763      2668      3200      3568      3925      4270 20050     1764      2670      3202      3571      3928      4273 20100     1766      2672      3205      3573      3931      4277 20150     1768      2676      3209      3578      3936      4283 20200     1771      2680      3214      3584      3942      4289 20250     1774      2684      3219      3589      3948      4295 20300     1776      2688      3224      3594      3954      4302 20350     1779      2692      3228      3600      3960      4308 20400     1782      2696      3233      3605      3965      4314 20450     1784      2700      3238      3610      3971      4321 20500     1787      2704      3243      3616      3977      4327 20550     1790      2708      3247      3621      3983      4333 20600     1792      2712      3252      3626      3989      4340 20650     1795      2716      3257      3631      3995      4346 20700     1797      2720      3262      3637      4000      4352 20750     1800      2724      3266      3642      4006      4359 20800     1803      2728      3271      3647      4012      4365 20850     1805      2732      3276      3653      4018      4372 20900     1808      2736      3281      3658      4024      4378 20950     1811      2740      3285      3663      4030      4384 21000     1813      2744      3290      3669      4035      4391 21050     1816      2748      3295      3674      4041      4397 21100     1819      2751      3300      3679      4047      4403 21150     1821      2755      3304      3685      4053      4410 21200     1824      2759      3309      3690      4059      4416 21250     1826      2763      3314      3695      4065      4422 21300     1829      2767      3319      3700      4070      4429 21350     1832      2771      3324      3706      4076      4435 21400     1834      2775      3328      3711      4082      4441 21450     1837      2779      3333      3716      4088      4448 21500     1840      2783      3338      3722      4094      4454 21550     1842      2787      3343      3727      4100      4460 21600     1845      2791      3347      3732      4105      4467 21650     1848      2795      3352      3738      4111      4473 21700     1850      2799      3357      3743      4117      4479 21750     1853      2803      3362      3748      4123      4486 21800     1856      2807      3366      3753      4129      4492 21850     1858      2811      3371      3759      4135      4498 21900     1861      2815      3376      3764      4140      4505 21950     1863      2819      3381      3769      4146      4511 22000     1866      2823      3385      3775      4152      4518 22050     1869      2827      3390      3780      4158      4524 22100     1871      2831      3395      3785      4164      4530 22150     1874      2835      3400      3791      4170      4537 22200     1877      2839      3404      3796      4175      4543 22250     1879      2843      3409      3801      4181      4549 22300     1882      2847      3414      3807      4187      4556 22350     1885      2851      3419      3812      4193      4562 22400     1887      2855      3423      3817      4199      4568 22450     1890      2859      3428      3822      4205      4575 22500     1892      2863      3433      3828      4211      4581 22550     1895      2867      3438      3833      4216      4587 22600     1898      2871      3442      3838      4222      4594 22650     1900      2875      3447      3844      4228      4600 22700     1903      2879      3452      3849      4234      4606 22750     1906      2883      3457      3854      4240      4613 22800     1908      2887      3461      3860      4246      4619 22850     1911      2891      3466      3865      4251      4625 22900     1914      2895      3471      3870      4257      4632 22950     1916      2899      3476      3875      4263      4638 23000     1919      2903      3481      3881      4269      4645 23050     1921      2907      3485      3886      4275      4651 23100     1924      2911      3490      3891      4281      4657 23150     1927      2915      3495      3897      4286      4664 23200     1929      2919      3500      3902      4292      4670 23250     1932      2923      3504      3907      4298      4676 23300     1935      2927      3509      3913      4304      4683 23350     1937      2931      3514      3918      4310      4689 23400     1940      2935      3519      3923      4316      4695 23450     1943      2939      3523      3929      4321      4702 23500     1945      2943      3528      3934      4327      4708 23550     1948      2947      3533      3939      4333      4714 23600     1951      2951      3538      3944      4339      4721 23650     1953      2955      3542      3950      4345      4727 23700     1956      2959      3547      3955      4351      4733 23750     1958      2962      3552      3960      4356      4740 23800     1961      2966      3557      3966      4362      4746 23850     1964      2970      3561      3971      4368      4752 23900     1966      2974      3566      3976      4374      4759 23950     1969      2978      3571      3982      4380      4765 24000     1972      2982      3576      3987      4386      4771 24050     1974      2986      3580      3992      4391      4778 24100     1977      2990      3585      3997      4397      4784 24150     1980      2994      3590      4003      4403      4791 24200     1982      2998      3595      4008      4409      4797 24250     1985      3002      3599      4013      4415      4803 24300     1987      3006      3604      4019      4421      4810 24350     1990      3010      3609      4024      4426      4816 24400     1993      3014      3614      4029      4432      4822 24450     1995      3018      3618      4035      4438      4829 24500     1998      3022      3623      4040      4444      4835 24550     2001      3026      3628      4045      4450      4841 24600     2003      3030      3633      4051      4456      4848 24650     2006      3034      3638      4056      4461      4854 24700     2009      3038      3642      4061      4467      4860 24750     2011      3042      3647      4066      4473      4867 24800     2014      3046      3652      4072      4479      4873 24850     2017      3050      3657      4077      4485      4879 24900     2019      3054      3661      4082      4491      4886 24950     2022      3058      3666      4088      4496      4892 25000     2024      3062      3671      4093      4502      4898 25050     2027      3066      3676      4098      4508      4905 25100     2030      3070      3680      4104      4514      4911 25150     2032      3074      3685      4109      4520      4917 25200     2035      3078      3690      4114      4526      4924 25250     2038      3082      3695      4119      4531      4930 25300     2040      3086      3699      4125      4537      4937 25350     2043      3090      3704      4130      4543      4943 25400     2046      3094      3709      4135      4549      4949 25450     2048      3098      3714      4141      4555      4956 25500     2051      3102      3718      4146      4561      4962 25550     2053      3106      3723      4151      4566      4968 25600     2056      3110      3728      4157      4572      4975 25650     2059      3114      3733      4162      4578      4981 25700     2061      3118      3737      4167      4584      4987 25750     2064      3122      3742      4173      4590      4994 25800     2067      3126      3747      4178      4596      5000 25850     2069      3130      3752      4183      4601      5006 25900     2072      3134      3756      4188      4607      5013 25950     2075      3138      3761      4194      4613      5019 26000     2077      3142      3766      4199      4619      5025 26050     2080      3146      3771      4204      4625      5032 26100     2083      3150      3775      4210      4631      5038 26150     2085      3154      3780      4215      4636      5044 26200     2088      3158      3785      4220      4642      5051 26250     2090      3162      3790      4226      4648      5057 26300     2093      3166      3794      4231      4654      5063 26350     2096      3170      3799      4236      4660      5070 26400     2098      3174      3804      4241      4666      5076 26450     2101      3177      3809      4247      4671      5083 26500     2104      3181      3814      4252      4677      5089 26550     2106      3185      3818      4257      4683      5095 26600     2109      3189      3823      4263      4689      5102 26650     2112      3193      3828      4268      4695      5108 26700     2114      3197      3833      4273      4701      5114 26750     2117      3201      3837      4279      4706      5121 26800     2119      3205      3842      4284      4712      5127 26850     2122      3209      3847      4289      4718      5133 26900     2125      3213      3852      4295      4724      5140 26950     2127      3217      3856      4300      4730      5146 27000     2130      3221      3861      4305      4736      5152 27050     2133      3225      3866      4310      4741      5159 27100     2135      3229      3871      4316      4747      5165 27150     2138      3233      3875      4321      4753      5171 27200     2141      3237      3880      4326      4759      5178 27250     2143      3241      3885      4332      4765      5184 27300     2146      3245      3890      4337      4771      5190 27350     2148      3249      3894      4342      4776      5197 27400     2151      3253      3899      4348      4782      5203 27450     2154      3257      3904      4353      4788      5210 27500     2156      3261      3909      4358      4794      5216 27550     2159      3265      3913      4363      4800      5222 27600     2162      3269      3918      4369      4806      5229 27650     2164      3273      3923      4374      4811      5235 27700     2167      3277      3928      4379      4817      5241 27750     2170      3281      3932      4385      4823      5248 27800     2172      3285      3937      4390      4829      5254 27850     2175      3289      3942      4395      4835      5260 27900     2178      3293      3947      4401      4841      5267 27950     2180      3297      3951      4406      4846      5273 28000     2183      3301      3956      4411      4852      5279 28050     2185      3305      3961      4417      4858      5286 28100     2188      3309      3966      4422      4864      5292 28150     2191      3313      3971      4427      4870      5298 28200     2193      3317      3975      4432      4876      5305 28250     2196      3321      3980      4438      4882      5311 28300     2199      3325      3985      4443      4887      5317 28350     2201      3329      3990      4448      4893      5324 28400     2204      3333      3994      4454      4899      5330 28450     2207      3337      3999      4459      4905      5336 28500     2209      3341      4004      4464      4911      5343 28550     2212      3345      4009      4470      4917      5349 28600     2214      3349      4013      4475      4922      5356 28650     2217      3353      4018      4480      4928      5362 28700     2220      3357      4023      4485      4934      5368 28750     2222      3361      4028      4491      4940      5375 28800     2225      3365      4032      4496      4946      5381 28850     2228      3369      4037      4501      4952      5387 28900     2230      3373      4042      4507      4957      5394 28950     2233      3377      4047      4512      4963      5400 29000     2236      3381      4051      4517      4969      5406 29050     2238      3385      4056      4523      4975      5413 29100     2241      3388      4061      4528      4981      5419 29150     2244      3392      4066      4533      4987      5425 29200     2246      3396      4070      4539      4992      5432 29250     2249      3400      4075      4544      4998      5438 29300     2251      3404      4080      4549      5004      5444 29350     2254      3408      4085      4554      5010      5451 29400     2257      3412      4089      4560      5016      5457 29450     2259      3416      4094      4565      5022      5463 29500     2262      3420      4099      4570      5027      5470 29550     2265      3424      4104      4576      5033      5476 29600     2267      3428      4108      4581      5039      5482 29650     2270      3432      4113      4586      5045      5489 29700     2273      3436      4118      4592      5051      5495 29750     2275      3440      4123      4597      5057      5502 29800     2278      3444      4127      4602      5062      5508 29850     2280      3448      4132      4607      5068      5514 29900     2283      3452      4137      4613      5074      5521 29950     2286      3456      4142      4618      5080      5527 30000     2288      3460      4147      4623      5086      5533 30050     2291      3464      4151      4629      5092      5540 30100     2294      3468      4156      4634      5097      5546 30150     2296      3472      4161      4639      5103      5552 30200     2299      3476      4166      4645      5109      5559 30250     2302      3480      4170      4650      5115      5565 30300     2304      3484      4175      4655      5121      5571 30350     2307      3488      4180      4661      5127      5578 30400     2309      3492      4185      4666      5132      5584 30450     2312      3496      4189      4671      5138      5590 30500     2315      3500      4194      4676      5144      5597 30550     2317      3504      4199      4682      5150      5603 30600     2320      3508      4204      4687      5156      5609 30650     2323      3512      4208      4692      5162      5616 30700     2325      3516      4213      4698      5167      5622 30750     2328      3520      4218      4703      5173      5628 30800     2331      3524      4223      4708      5179      5635 30850     2333      3528      4227      4714      5185      5641 30900     2336      3532      4232      4719      5191      5648 30950     2339      3536      4237      4724      5197      5654 31000     2341      3540      4242      4729      5202      5660 31050     2344      3544      4246      4735      5208      5667 31100     2346      3548      4251      4740      5214      5673 31150     2349      3552      4256      4745      5220      5679 31200     2352      3556      4261      4751      5226      5686 31250     2354      3560      4265      4756      5232      5692 31300     2357      3564      4270      4761      5237      5698 31350     2360      3568      4275      4767      5243      5705 31400     2362      3572      4280      4772      5249      5711 31450     2365      3576      4284      4777      5255      5717 31500     2368      3580      4289      4783      5261      5724 31550     2370      3584      4294      4788      5267      5730 31600     2373      3588      4299      4793      5272      5736 31650     2375      3592      4304      4798      5278      5743 31700     2378      3596      4308      4804      5284      5749 31750     2381      3600      4313      4809      5290      5755 31800     2383      3603      4318      4814      5296      5762 31850     2386      3607      4323      4820      5302      5768 31900     2389      3611      4327      4825      5307      5774 31950     2391      3615      4332      4830      5313      5781 32000     2394      3619      4337      4836      5319      5787 32050     2397      3623      4342      4841      5325      5794 32100     2399      3627      4346      4846      5331      5800 32150     2402      3631      4351      4851      5337      5806 32200     2405      3635      4356      4857      5342      5813 32250     2407      3639      4361      4862      5348      5819 32300     2410      3643      4365      4867      5354      5825 32350     2412      3647      4370      4873      5360      5832 32400     2415      3651      4375      4878      5366      5838 32450     2418      3655      4380      4883      5372      5844 32500     2420      3659      4384      4889      5377      5851 32550     2423      3663      4389      4894      5383      5857 32600     2426      3667      4394      4899      5389      5863 32650     2428      3671      4399      4905      5395      5870 32700     2431      3675      4403      4910      5401      5876 32750     2434      3679      4408      4915      5407      5882 32800     2436      3683      4413      4920      5412      5889 32850     2439      3687      4418      4926      5418      5895 32900     2441      3691      4422      4931      5424      5901 32950     2444      3695      4427      4936      5430      5908 33000     2447      3699      4432      4942      5436      5914 33050     2449      3703      4437      4947      5442      5921 33100     2452      3707      4441      4952      5447      5927 33150     2455      3711      4446      4958      5453      5933 33200     2457      3715      4451      4963      5459      5940 33250     2460      3719      4456      4968      5465      5946 33300     2463      3723      4461      4973      5471      5952 33350     2465      3727      4465      4979      5477      5959 33400     2468      3731      4470      4984      5482      5965 33450     2471      3735      4475      4989      5488      5971 33500     2473      3739      4480      4995      5494      5978 33550     2476      3743      4484      5000      5500      5984 33600     2478      3747      4489      5005      5506      5990 33650     2481      3751      4494      5011      5512      5997 33700     2484      3755      4499      5016      5517      6003 33750     2486      3759      4503      5021      5523      6009 33800     2489      3763      4508      5027      5529      6016 33850     2492      3767      4513      5032      5535      6022 33900     2494      3771      4518      5037      5541      6028 33950     2497      3775      4522      5042      5547      6035 34000     2500      3779      4527      5048      5552      6041 34050     2502      3783      4532      5053      5558      6047 34100     2505      3787      4537      5058      5564      6054 34150     2507      3791      4541      5064      5570      6060 34200     2510      3795      4546      5069      5576      6067 34250     2513      3799      4551      5074      5582      6073 34300     2515      3803      4556      5080      5588      6079 34350     2518      3807      4560      5085      5593      6086 34400     2521      3811      4565      5090      5599      6092 34450     2523      3814      4570      5095      5605      6098 34500     2526      3818      4575      5101      5611      6105 34550     2529      3822      4579      5106      5617      6111 34600     2531      3826      4584      5111      5623      6117 34650     2534      3830      4589      5117      5628      6124 34700     2536      3834      4594      5122      5634      6130 34750     2539      3838      4598      5127      5640      6136 34800     2542      3842      4603      5133      5646      6143 34850     2544      3846      4608      5138      5652      6149 34900     2547      3850      4613      5143      5658      6155 34950     2550      3854      4617      5149      5663      6162 35000     2552      3858      4622      5154      5669      6168 35050     2555      3862      4627      5159      5675      6174 35100     2558      3866      4632      5164      5681      6181 35150     2560      3870      4637      5170      5687      6187 35200     2563      3874      4641      5175      5693      6193 35250     2566      3878      4646      5180      5698      6200 35300     2568      3882      4651      5186      5704      6206 35350     2571      3886      4656      5191      5710      6213 35400     2573      3890      4660      5196      5716      6219 35450     2576      3894      4665      5202      5722      6225 35500     2579      3898      4670      5207      5728      6232 35550     2581      3902      4675      5212      5733      6238 35600     2584      3906      4679      5217      5739      6244 35650     2587      3910      4684      5223      5745      6251 35700     2589      3914      4689      5228      5751      6257 35750     2592      3918      4694      5233      5757      6263 35800     2595      3922      4698      5239      5763      6270 35850     2597      3926      4703      5244      5768      6276 35900     2600      3930      4708      5249      5774      6282 35950     2602      3934      4713      5255      5780      6289 36000     2605      3938      4717      5260      5786      6295 36050     2608      3942      4722      5265      5792      6301 36100     2610      3946      4727      5271      5798      6308 36150     2613      3950      4732      5276      5803      6314 36200     2616      3954      4736      5281      5809      6320 36250     2618      3958      4741      5286      5815      6327 36300     2621      3962      4746      5292      5821      6333 36350     2624      3966      4751      5297      5827      6339 36400     2626      3970      4755      5302      5833      6346 36450     2629      3974      4760      5308      5838      6352 36500     2632      3978      4765      5313      5844      6359 36550     2634      3982      4770      5318      5850      6365 36600     2637      3986      4774      5324      5856      6371 36650     2639      3990      4779      5329      5862      6378 36700     2642      3994      4784      5334      5868      6384 36750     2645      3998      4789      5339      5873      6390 36800     2647      4002      4794      5345      5879      6397 36850     2650      4006      4798      5350      5885      6403 36900     2653      4010      4803      5355      5891      6409 36950     2655      4014      4808      5361      5897      6416 37000     2658      4018      4813      5366      5903      6422 37050     2661      4022      4817      5371      5908      6428 37100     2663      4025      4822      5377      5914      6435 37150     2666      4029      4827      5382      5920      6441 37200     2668      4033      4832      5387      5926      6447 37250     2671      4037      4836      5393      5932      6454 37300     2674      4041      4841      5398      5938      6460 37350     2676      4045      4846      5403      5943      6466 37400     2679      4049      4851      5408      5949      6473 37450     2682      4053      4855      5414      5955      6479 37500     2684      4057      4860      5419      5961      6485 37550     2687      4061      4865      5424      5967      6492 37600     2690      4065      4870      5430      5973      6498 37650     2692      4069      4874      5435      5978      6505 37700     2695      4073      4879      5440      5984      6511 37750     2698      4077      4884      5446      5990      6517 37800     2700      4081      4889      5451      5996      6524 37850     2703      4085      4893      5456      6002      6530 37900     2705      4089      4898      5461      6008      6536 37950     2708      4093      4903      5467      6013      6543 38000     2711      4097      4908      5472      6019      6549 38050     2713      4101      4912      5477      6025      6555 38100     2716      4105      4917      5483      6031      6562 38150     2719      4109      4922      5488      6037      6568 38200     2721      4113      4927      5493      6043      6574 38250     2724      4117      4931      5499      6048      6581 38300     2727      4121      4936      5504      6054      6587 38350     2729      4125      4941      5509      6060      6593 38400     2732      4129      4946      5515      6066      6600 38450     2734      4133      4951      5520      6072      6606 38500     2737      4137      4955      5525      6078      6612 38550     2740      4141      4960      5530      6083      6619 38600     2742      4145      4965      5536      6089      6625 38650     2745      4149      4970      5541      6095      6632 38700     2748      4153      4974      5546      6101      6638 38750     2750      4157      4979      5552      6107      6644 38800     2753      4161      4984      5557      6113      6651 38850     2756      4165      4989      5562      6118      6657 38900     2758      4169      4993      5568      6124      6663 38950     2761      4173      4998      5573      6130      6670 39000     2763      4177      5003      5578      6136      6676 39050     2766      4181      5008      5583      6142      6682 39100     2769      4185      5012      5589      6148      6689 39150     2771      4189      5017      5594      6153      6695 39200     2774      4193      5022      5599      6159      6701 39250     2777      4197      5027      5605      6165      6708 39300     2779      4201      5031      5610      6171      6714 39350     2782      4205      5036      5615      6177      6720 39400     2785      4209      5041      5621      6183      6727 39450     2787      4213      5046      5626      6188      6733 39500     2790      4217      5050      5631      6194      6739 39550     2793      4221      5055      5637      6200      6746 39600     2795      4225      5060      5642      6206      6752 39650     2798      4229      5065      5647      6212      6758 39700     2800      4233      5069      5652      6218      6765 39750     2803      4237      5074      5658      6223      6771 39800     2806      4240      5079      5663      6229      6778 39850     2808      4244      5084      5668      6235      6784 39900     2811      4248      5088      5674      6241      6790 39950     2814      4252      5093      5679      6247      6797 40000     2816      4256      5098      5684      6253      6803 (2)  The guidelines provided for in subsection (1) of this section apply unless the judicial or administrative body awarding or modifying the child-support award makes a written finding or specific finding on the record that the application of the guidelines would be unjust or inappropriate in a particular case as determined under the criteria specified in Section 43-19-103. (3)  The amount of "combined adjusted monthly gross income" as that term is used in subsection (1) of this section shall be calculated as follows: (a)  Determine gross income from both parents considering all potential sources that may reasonably be expected to be available * * *to the absent parent including, but not limited to, the following:  wages and salary income; income from self-employment; income from commissions; income from investments, including dividends, interest income and income on any trust account or property; absent parent's portion of any joint income of both parents; workers' compensation, disability, unemployment, annuity and retirement benefits, including an Individual Retirement Account (IRA); any other payments made by any person, private entity, federal or state government or any unit of local government; alimony; any income earned from an interest in or from inherited property; any other form of earned income; and gross income shall exclude any monetary benefits derived from a second household, such as income of the absent parent's current spouse; (b)  Subtract the following legally mandated deductions: (i)  Federal, state and local taxes.  Contributions to the payment of taxes over and beyond the actual liability for the taxable year shall not be considered a mandatory deduction; (ii)  Social security contributions; (iii)  Retirement and disability contributions except any voluntary retirement and disability contributions; (c)  If the obligated parent is subject to an existing court order for another child or children, subtract the amount of that court-ordered support; (d)  If the absent parent is also the parent of another child or other children residing with him, then the court may subtract an amount that it deems appropriate to account for the needs of said child or children; (e)  Compute the total annual amount of combined adjusted monthly gross income based on paragraphs (a) through (d) of this subsection, then * * * divide this amount by twelve (12) to obtain the monthly amount of combined adjusted monthly gross income child support payments. * * *Upon conclusion of the calculation of paragraphs (a) through (e) of this subsection, multiply the monthly amount of adjusted gross income by the appropriate percentage designated in subsection (1) of this section to arrive at the amount of the monthly child‑support award. (4)  In cases in which the adjusted gross income as defined in this section is more than One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) or less than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), the court shall make a written finding in the record as to whether or not the application of the guidelines established in this section is reasonable.  The court shall take into account the basic subsistence needs of the obligated parent who has a limited ability to pay. (5)  * * *Imputation of income shall not be based upon a standard amount in lieu of fact‑gathering. In the absence of specific sufficient evidence of past earnings and employment history to use as the measure of an obligated parent's ability to pay, the recommended child-support obligation amount should be based on available information about the specific circumstances of the obligated parent.  This can include, but is not limited to, such factors as assets, residence, job skills, educational attainment, literacy, age, health, criminal record and other employment barriers, and record of seeking work, as well as the local job market, the availability of employers willing to hire the obligated parent, prevailing earnings level in the local community, and other relevant factors in the case. (6)  Unless extended or waived, the Department of Human Services shall review the appropriateness of these guidelines beginning January 1, 1994, and every four (4) years thereafter and report its findings to the Legislature no later than the first day of the regular legislative session of that year.  The Legislature shall thereafter amend these guidelines when it finds that amendment is necessary to ensure that equitable support is being awarded in all cases involving the support of minor children. (7)  All orders involving support of minor children, as a matter of law, shall include reasonable medical support.  Notice to the obligated parent's employer that medical support has been ordered shall be on a form as prescribed by the Department of Human Services.  In any case in which the support of any child is involved, the court shall make the following findings either on the record or in the judgment: (a)  The availability to all parties of health insurance coverage for the child(ren); (b)  The cost of health insurance coverage to all parties. The court shall then make appropriate provisions in the judgment for the provision of health insurance coverage for the child(ren) in the manner that is in the best interests of the child(ren).  If the court requires the custodial parent to obtain the coverage then its cost shall be taken into account in establishing the child-support award.  If the court determines that health insurance coverage is not available to any party or that it is not available to either party at a cost that is reasonable as compared to the income of the parties, then the court shall make specific findings as to such either on the record or in the judgment.  In that event, the court shall make appropriate provisions in the judgment for the payment of medical expenses of the child(ren) in the absence of health insurance coverage. SECTION 2.  Section 43-19-39, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-19-39.  (1)  All child support payments collected by the child support unit pursuant to Section 43-19-35 shall be distributed in the manner as prescribed by the federal Social Security Act and any amendments adopted thereto.  Nothing contained herein shall preclude the child support unit in processing a paternity or support action for and on behalf of a child or children receiving aid to dependent children grants wherein the applicant or recipient has refused cooperation.  If a parent of any child receiving public assistance fails or refuses to cooperate with the local county department or child support unit in locating and securing support from the nonsupporting responsible parent, this parent may be cited to appear before the judge of any court having jurisdiction over such matter and compelled to disclose such information under oath.  Any parent who, having been cited to appear before a judge of the court having jurisdiction over such matter, fails or refuses to appear or fails or refuses to provide the information requested may be found to be in contempt of said court and may be fined not more than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) or imprisoned not more than six (6) months or both. (2)  In a manner which is consistent with the federal Social Security Act, any amendments thereto and its implementing regulations, the child support unit is hereby authorized to withhold from distribution any payment or portion thereof which it may receive on behalf of a child or children for whom it is providing services if reimbursement is needed for any payments which may have been mistakenly or erroneously advanced on behalf of that child or children. The child support unit shall adopt policies that minimize any hardship that is caused by withholding from distribution any current support payments to reimburse past mistaken or erroneous advancements. SECTION 3.  Section 43-19-103, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-19-103.  The rebuttable presumption as to the justness or appropriateness of an award or modification of a child support award in this state, based upon the guidelines established by Section 43-19-101, may be overcome by a judicial or administrative body awarding or modifying the child support award by making a written finding or specific finding on the record that the application of the guidelines would be unjust or inappropriate in a particular case as determined according to the following criteria: (a)  Extraordinary medical, psychological, educational or dental expenses. (b)  Independent income of the child. (c)  The payment of both child support and spousal support to the obligee. (d)  Seasonal variations in one or both parents' incomes or expenses. (e)  The age of the child, taking into account the greater needs of older children. (f)  Special needs that have traditionally been met within the family budget even though the fulfilling of those needs will cause the support to exceed the proposed guidelines. (g)  The particular shared parental arrangement, such as where the noncustodial parent spends a great deal of time with the children thereby reducing the financial expenditures incurred by the custodial parent, or the refusal of the noncustodial parent to become involved in the activities of the child, or giving due consideration to the custodial parent's homemaking services. (h)  Total available assets of the obligee, obligor and the child. (i)  Payment by the obligee of child care expenses in order that the obligee may seek or retain employment, or because of the disability of the obligee. (j)  Any other adjustment which is needed to achieve an equitable result which may include, but not be limited to, a reasonable and necessary existing expense or debt. SECTION 4.  Section 43-19-105, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-19-105.  The court may not consider incarceration as intentional or voluntary unemployment or underemployment when establishing or modifying a child-support order. SECTION 5.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.